District of Columbia statutes.
21-2404.02

Registration of protective orders.

If a conservator has been appointed in another state and a petition for a protective order is not pending in the District of Columbia, the conservator appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the protective order in the District by filing as a foreign judgment in the Superior Court certified copies of the order and letters of office and of any bond.

History

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 402 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.